Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.403

Authority to establish lake and beach management districts.

Any city or town may establish lake and beach management districts within its boundaries as provided in chapter 36.61 RCW. When a city or town establishes a lake or beach management district pursuant to chapter 36.61 RCW, the term "county legislative authority" shall be deemed to mean the city or town governing body, the term "county" shall be deemed to mean the city or town, and the term "county treasurer" shall be deemed to mean the city or town treasurer or other fiscal officer.

[ 2008 c 301 s 28; 1985 c 398 s 27.]